Oklahoma, session 2026, SB605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4-107 of Title 37A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


No county or municipality shall require a distillery which has


produced two thousand five hundred cases or fewer in the last


calendar year, and is not open to the public, to maintain a certain


driveway width.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-568 CAD 1/19/2025 5:39:51 AM







Req. No. 568 Page 1